Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1004
Board; dead human bodies; transportation.

The State Anatomical Board may employ a carrier or carriers for the transportation of bodies, referred to in sections 71-1001 to 71-1007, and may transport such bodies, or order them to be transported, under such rules and regulations as it may adopt and promulgate.

Laws 1929, c. 158, § 4, p. 553;

C.S.1929, § 71-2804;

R.S.1943, § 71-1004;

Laws 2019, LB559, § 3.